Rhode Island, session 2025, SB30.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 16 of the General Laws entitled "EDUCATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 117
POSTSECONDARY TUITION ASSISTANCE FOR SHORTAGE TEACHING FIELDS
16-117-1. Creation.
There is hereby established within the office of the postsecondary commissioner (“OPC”)
a restricted receipt account entitled the Shortage Teaching Fields Tuition Assistance Fund (“the
fund”). The fund shall be used to provide payment from the state to an eligible individual’s
institution of higher education toward a portion of their tuition and other costs of attending said
institution under this chapter.
16-117-2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the following
meanings:
(1) "Costs of attending" means expenses other than tuition, room, board, and mandatory
fees that are necessary to the successful completion of a degree program at a Rhode Island
postsecondary institution. Such expenses shall be paid for in accordance with rules and regulations
promulgated by OPC, and may include, but are not limited to, transportation, child care, and course-
related books and materials.

(2) "OPC" means the office of the postsecondary commissioner.
(3) "Service requirement" means specific employment and work obligations that
individuals shall meet if they receive tuition assistance under this chapter.
(4) "Shortage teaching fields" means subject areas or teacher certifications that are
experiencing a critical lack of educators in the State of Rhode Island. These shall include, but are
not limited to:
(i) Any sciences for grades seven (7) through twelve (12); and
(ii) Any mathematics for grades seven (7) through twelve (12).
(5) "Tuition assistance recipients" means individuals receiving assistance toward their
tuition and other costs of attending a postsecondary institution under this chapter.
16-117-3. Eligibility of individuals.
(a) In general, tuition assistance recipients under this chapter shall:
(1) Be enrolled, or accepted for enrollment, at a Rhode Island postsecondary institution in
a program to become a teacher in a shortage field;
(2) Complete the service requirement set forth in § 16-117-4; and
(3) Fulfill any other conditions required by OPC.
(b) Tuition assistance recipients under this chapter shall not be required to:
(1) Provide a score from the Scholastic Assessment Test (SAT) or Advanced Placement
(AP) test as a condition of admission to the teaching degree program of any postsecondary
institution in Rhode Island; or
(2) Be a resident of Rhode Island.
(c) If an individual receives tuition assistance under this chapter, and then leaves their
institution’s program to become a teacher in a shortage field prior to completing their degree, the
tuition assistance provided to date shall become a loan to be repaid by the individual.
(d) If an individual receives tuition assistance under this chapter, and then does not
complete the service requirement provided in § 16-117-4, the tuition assistance provided to date
shall become a loan to be repaid by the individual.
(e) Transferring from one postsecondary institution in Rhode Island to a different
postsecondary institution in Rhode Island shall not negatively affect an individual’s eligibility for
tuition assistance under this chapter; provided that, they remain in compliance with all other
eligibility requirements.
16-117-4. Service requirements to receive tuition assistance.
To receive tuition assistance under this chapter, individuals shall complete at least three (3)
years of full-time teaching in a shortage teaching field at any elementary or secondary school in the
LC000215 - Page 2 of 5

state.
16-117-5. Disbursement.
All funds distributed in accordance with this chapter shall be:
(1) Allocated toward the tuition, room, board, mandatory fees, and additional costs of
attending a Rhode Island postsecondary institution to become a teacher in a shortage field;
(2) Provided to cover tuition, room, board, mandatory fees, and/or costs of attending a
Rhode Island postsecondary institution that remain after all other financial aid funds have been
awarded to the tuition assistance recipient; and
(3) Available for individuals to attend any Rhode Island postsecondary institution, public
or private; provided that, funds disbursed to a private institution for tuition, room, board, and
mandatory fees shall be limited to the amount that Rhode Island college charges for the same
expenses in the same academic year. Additional costs of attending a private institution shall be paid
for in accordance with regulations promulgated by OPC.
16-117-6. Administration of shortage teaching field tuition assistance fund.
OPC shall administer the fund and OPC shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary
to implement this chapter, which shall include, but are not limited to:
(1) The process for defining any shortage teaching fields in addition to the ones provided
in § 16-117-2, and updating said definition at least once every other year;
(2) Providing an easy-to-follow guide in a variety of languages regarding how to apply for
tuition assistance under this chapter;
(3) How to fulfill the service requirement, including the length of time afforded to
individuals to complete it and consideration for leaves of absence related to the health of the
individual or a close family member, pregnancy, and military service; and
(4) Defining the nature and extent of costs of attending a postsecondary institution,
identified in § 16-117-2, that individuals may receive assistance for under this chapter.
16-117-7. Reporting
(a) By August 1, 2026, and annually by August 1 thereafter, OPC shall provide an
evaluation of the fund to the speaker of the house, senate president, and the governor. The
evaluation shall include, but is not limited to, the following:
(1) The number of individuals whose request for tuition assistance under this chapter was
approved;
(2) The actual dollar amount paid for tuition assistance in the previous year;
(3) The shortage teaching area for which individuals received tuition assistance; and
(4) The name of the postsecondary institution(s) the individual attended.
LC000215 - Page 3 of 5

(b) Reporting required under this section shall take extreme care to maintain the privacy of
the individuals requesting and/or receiving tuition assistance under this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000215
========
LC000215 - Page 4 of 5